Hawaii statutes.
§211F-4 Powers of corporation. (a)
The corporation shall have all of the powers necessary to carry out its
purposes which shall include but not be limited to the power to:

(1) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;

(2) Adopt an official seal;

(3) Sue and be sued, in its own name;

(4) Finance, conduct, or cooperate in financing or
conducting technological, business, financial, or other investigations that are
related to or likely to lead to business and economic development by making and
entering into contracts and other appropriate arrangements, including the
provision of loans, start-up and expansion capital, and other forms of
assistance;

(5) Solicit, study, and assist in the preparation of
business plans and proposals;

(6) Provide advice and technical and marketing
assistance, support, and promotion to enterprises in which investments have
been made;

(7) Coordinate the corporation's programs with any
education and training program;

(8) Carry out specialized programs designed to
encourage the development of new products, businesses, and markets;

(9) Prepare, publish, and distribute such technical
studies, reports, bulletins, and other materials as it deems appropriate,
subject only to the maintenance and respect for confidentiality of client
proprietary information;

(10) Organize, conduct, sponsor, or cooperate in and
assist in the conduct of conferences, demonstrations, and studies relating to
the stimulation and formation of businesses;

(11) Provide and pay for such advisory services and
technical, managerial, and marketing assistance, support, and promotion as may
be necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(12) Acquire, hold, and sell qualified securities;

(13) Consent, subject to the provisions of any
contract with noteholders or bondholders, whenever the corporation deems it
necessary or desirable in the fulfillment of the purposes of this chapter, to
the modification, with respect to rate of interest, time of payment of any installment
of principal or interest, or any other terms, of any contract or agreement of
any kind to which the corporation is a party;

(14) Accept donations, grants, bequests, and devises
of money, property, service, or other things of value that may be received from
the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, or any public
or private institution, person, firm, or corporation, to be held, used, or
applied for any or all of the purposes specified in this chapter. Receipt of
each donation or grant shall be detailed in the annual report of the
corporation. The report shall include the identity of the donor or lender, the
nature of the transaction, and any conditions attaching thereto;

(15) Invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds,
or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in such investments as
may be lawful for fiduciaries in the State;

(16) Acquire real property, or an interest therein, by
purchase or foreclosure, where that acquisition is necessary or appropriate to
protect or secure any investment or loan in which the corporation has an
interest; sell, transfer, and convey the property to a buyer and if the sale,
transfer, or conveyance cannot be effected with reasonable promptness or at a
reasonable price, to lease the property to a tenant;

(17) Acquire, own, hold, dispose of, and encumber
personal property of any nature, or any interest therein;

(18) Enter into agreements or other transactions with
any federal, state, or county agency;

(19) Make contracts and execute all instruments
necessary or convenient for the carrying on of its business;

(20) Appear in its own behalf before state, county, or
federal agencies;

(21) Procure insurance as may be necessary;

(22) Appoint officers, employees, consultants, agents,
and advisors who shall not be subject to chapter 76, and prescribe their duties
and fix compensation within the limitations provided by law;

(23) Appoint advisory committees as deemed necessary;
and

(24) Exercise any other powers of a corporation
organized under the laws of the State.

(b) The corporation shall not promise to
answer for the debts of any other person. [L 1990, c 110, pt of §3; am L 2000,
c 253, §150; am L 2004, c 215, §5; am L 2015, c 237, §30]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next